Mississippi statutes. Title 33. Military Affairs
Article 15. Sentences.

§ 33-13-351.
Cruel and unusual punishment prohibited.

Punishment by flogging, or by branding, marking or tatooing on the body, or any other cruel or unusual punishment, may not be adjudged by any court-martial or inflicted upon any person subject to this code. The use of irons, single or double, except for the purpose of safe custody, is prohibited.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-56; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 56, eff from and after June 1, 1966.

§ 33-13-353.
Maximum limits.

The punishment which a court-martial may direct for an offense may not exceed the limits prescribed by this code or by federal law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-57; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 57; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 57, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-355.
Effective date of sentences.

Any period of confinement included in a sentence of a court-martial begins to run from the date the sentence is adjudged by the court-martial but periods during which the sentence to confinement is suspended or deferred shall be excluded in computing the service of the term of confinement.

On application by an accused who is under sentence to confinement that has not been ordered executed, the convening authority or, if the accused is no longer under his jurisdiction, the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned, may in his sole discretion defer service of the sentence to confinement. The deferment shall terminate when the sentence is ordered executed. The deferment may be rescinded at any time by the officer who granted it or, if the accused is no longer under his jurisdiction, by the officer exercising general court-martial jurisdiction over the command to which the accused is currently assigned.

In the militia or state military forces not in federal service, no sentence of dismissal or dishonorable discharge may be executed until all reviews and any appeals to the Mississippi Court of Military Appeals are complete.

All other sentences of courts-martial are effective on the date ordered executed.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-58; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 58; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 58, eff from and after July 1, 1981.

§ 33-13-357.
Execution of confinement.

A sentence of confinement adjudged by a military court, whether or not the sentence includes discharge or dismissal, and whether or not the discharge or dismissal has been executed, may be carried into execution by confinement in any place of confinement under the control of any of the state military forces or in any jail, penitentiary, or prison or other institution, under the control of this state or any political subdivision thereof and designated by the Adjutant General. Persons so confined in a jail, penitentiary, prison or other institution are subject to the same discipline and treatment as persons confined or committed to the jail, penitentiary, prison or other institutions by the courts of the state or of any political subdivision thereof.

The omission of the words “hard labor” from any sentence or punishment of a court-martial adjudging confinement does not deprive the authority executing that sentence or punishment of the power to require hard labor as a part of the punishment.

The keepers, officers, and wardens of any jails, penitentiaries, prisons, or other institutions, under the control of this state or any political subdivision thereof, shall receive persons ordered into confinement before trial and persons committed to confinement by a military court and shall confine them according to law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8529-59; Laws, 1966, ch. 538, § 59; Laws, 1981, ch. 362, § 59, eff from and after July 1, 1981.